Tennessee, session 114, HB0062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-24-101(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2) "Athletic trainer" means a person with specific qualifications as set forth in
this chapter, who, upon the advice, consent, and oral or written prescriptions or referrals
of a physician licensed under this title, carries out the practice of prevention, recognition,
evaluation, management, disposition, treatment, or rehabilitation of athletic injuries; and
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 24, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
63-24-109.
(a) An athletic trainer may use dry needling, as defined in § 63-13-103, and
physical modalities, such as heat, light, sound, cold, electricity, or mechanical devices,
for the prevention, recognition, evaluation, management, disposition, rehabilitation, and
treatment of athletic injuries.
(b) An athletic trainer must practice only in those areas in which an athletic
trainer is competent by reason of training or experience that can be substantiated by
records or other evidence found acceptable by the board in the exercise of the board's
considered discretion.
(c) An athletic trainer must obtain proper training and certification in order to
practice dry needling. The practice of dry needling by an athletic trainer under this
HB0062
000865
- 1 -

chapter does not constitute the practice of acupuncture under chapter 6, part 10 of this
title.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-24-111(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Establish minimum competency requirements that an athletic trainer must
demonstrate in order to practice dry needling;
SECTION 4. For the purpose of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming
law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2025, the
public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000865